North Dakota, session 69, HB1589.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 7 of section 62.1-01-01 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
7. "Law enforcement officer" means:
a. A public servant authorized by law or by a government agency or branch to enforce the
law and to conduct or engage in investigations or prosecutions for violations of law; or
b. A retired public servant in good standing who:
(1) Was authorized by law or by a government agency or branch for at least ten years
to enforce the law and to conduct or engage in investigations or prosecutions for
violations of law or who was separated from service due to a service-related
physical disability;
(2) Maintains the same;
a. Same level of firearms proficiency as is required by the peace officers
standards and training board for law enforcement officers, maintains the
standards for qualifications in firearms training for active law enforcement
officers as determined by the former agency of the individual in the state in
which the individual resides, or maintains the standards;
b. Standards used by a certified firearms instructor qualified to conduct a
firearms qualification test for active duty officers in the state in which the
individual resides; or
c. Standards for qualification in firearms training as determined by the attorney
general used by a certified concealed weapon test administrator qualified to
conduct a firearms qualification test by the attorney general for retired officers
in the state or out-of-state;
(3) Has a photo identification card issued by a local law enforcement agency which
identifies the individual as having been employed by a government agency or
branch as a law enforcement officer and indicates the individual has passed the
firearms proficiency test within twelve months from the date of issue; and
(4) Has not been found by a qualified medical professional to be unqualified for reasons
relating to mental health or entered an agreement with a government agency or
branch in which the public servant acknowledges a lack of qualifications for reasons
relating to the mental health of the public servant.

H. B. NO. 1589 - PAGE 2
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 62.1-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Law enforcement agency and concealed weapons test administrator certification - Records.
1. A law enforcement agency or a concealed weapon test administrator may certify an individual
has maintained the qualifications under section 62.1 - 01 - 01, but may not qualify an individua l
to carry a concealed firearm under the Law Enforcement Officer's Safety Act Improvement Act
of 2010 [Pub. L. 111-272].
2. A law enforcement agency and a concealed weapon test administrator shall forward to the
peace officer standards and training board a record of all individuals who have successfully
completed a proficiency qualification course.

H. B. NO. 1589 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1589.
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State